Washington statutes.
RCW 43.84.150

Authority of state investment board to invest, reinvest, manage investments acquired.

When investment authority over a particular fund or account lies with the state investment board, the board shall have full power to invest, reinvest, manage, contract, or sell or exchange investments acquired. Investments shall be made in accordance with RCW 43.33A.140 and investment policy duly established and published by the state investment board.

[ 2012 c 187 s 15; 1998 c 14 s 4; 1981 c 98 s 1; 1981 c 3 s 20; 1979 c 119 s 3; 1977 ex.s. c 251 s 5; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 17 s 2. Prior: 1975 1st ex.s. c 252 s 1; 1975 1st ex.s. c 81 s 1; 1973 1st ex.s. c 103 s 12.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1981 c 98: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1981." [ 1981 c 98 s 2.]

Effective dates—Severability—1981 c 3: See notes following RCW 43.33A.010.

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 103: See note following RCW 2.10.080.